District of Columbia statutes.
19-308

Share of father and mother.

When the intestate leaves no child, or descendant, the whole is divided equally between the father and mother or their survivor.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 698, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Sept. 10, 1966, 80 Stat. 738, Pub. L. 89-567, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 19-308.
1973 Ed., § 19-308.

Prior Codifications